Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1414
Joint authority; issue bonds; pledge revenue; restrictions.

A joint authority may issue bonds and pledge the revenue, or any portion thereof, derived or to be derived from all or any of its projects, and any additions and improvements to or extensions of such projects, or contributions or advances from or loans to its members to pay for the principal and interest of such bonds. Bonds of a joint authority shall be authorized by resolution adopted by its board of directors. Any bonds so issued shall be subject to the restrictions contained in sections 70-644 to 70-648.

Laws 1982, LB 852, § 14.